Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.565

Motor vehicle transportation service—Powers and duties—Agency exemptions.

The department shall establish a motor vehicle transportation service which is hereby empowered to:

(1) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services to state agencies on either a temporary or permanent basis and upon such demonstration of need as the department may require;

(2) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies located in the Olympia area and such additional motor pools at other locations in the state as may be necessary to provide economic, efficient, and effective motor vehicle transportation services to state agencies. Such additional motor pools may be under either the direct control of the department or under the supervision of another state agency by agreement with the department;

(3) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage charges to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished which shall be designed to provide funds to recover the actual total costs of motor pool operations including but not limited to vehicle operation expense, depreciation expense, overhead, and nonrecoverable collision or other damage to vehicles; and

(4) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for fleet operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies adopted by the office of financial management under *RCW 43.41.130.

Unless otherwise determined by the director after consultation with the office of financial management, vehicles owned and managed by the department of transportation, the department of natural resources, and the Washington state patrol are exempt from the requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 231; 2005 c 214 s 1; 1998 c 111 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 was recodified as RCW 43.19.622 pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.